test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-laeqbdi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - läʼbḑi: # Noun 190 'eng /est labidas/fin' - full paradigm
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Nom: [läʼbḑi, läbḑi]
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Gen: [läʼbḑiz, läbḑiz]
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Par: [läʼbḑizt, läbḑizt]
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Dat: [läʼbḑin, läbḑin]
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Ins: [läʼbḑiks, läbḑiks]
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Ill: [läʼbḑizõ, läbḑizõ]
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Ela: [läʼbḑist, läbḑist]
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Nom: [läʼbḑid, läbḑid]
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Gen: [läʼbḑid, läbḑid]
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Par: [läʼbḑidi, läbḑidi]
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Dat: [läʼbḑidõn, läbḑidõn]
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Ins: [läʼbḑidõks, läbḑidõks]
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Ill: [läʼbḑiž, läbḑiž]
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Ela: [läʼbḑisti, läbḑisti]
